en: Car type: Convertible; Coupe; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Wagon; Other
de: Autotyp: Konvertierbar; Coupe; Überkreuzt; Fließheck; SUV; Limousine; Kombi; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Vrsta automobila: Promjenjivog oblika; Coupe; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Karavan; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип автомобил: Кабриолет; Купе; Кросоувър; Хечбек; SUV; Седан; Комби; Други
fr: Type de voiture: Convertible; Coupé; Croisés; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Wagon; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de automóvel: Conversível; Cupê; Cruzado; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Wagon; Outro
zh-CN: 车类型: 可转换; 双门小轿车; 交叉; 掀背车; SUV; 轿车; 四轮运货车; 其他
vi: Loại ô tô: Chuyển đổi; Xe hai cửa; Bộ phân tầng loa; Xe có cửa sau; SUV; Xe sedan; Xe bốn bánh; Khác
ru: Тип автомобиля: Трансформер; Купе; Кроссовер; Хэтчбек; Универсал; Седан; Вагон; Другое
nb: Biltype: Omformbar; Kupé; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Vogn; Annet
lt-LT: Automobilio tipas: Transformuojama; Kupė; Krosoveris; Hečbekas; SUV; Sedanas; Vagonas; Kita
el: Τύπος αυτοκινήτου: Πολυχρηστικό; Κουπέ; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Στέισον βάγκον; Άλλο
sv: Biltyp: Konvertibel; Coupé; Crossover; Halvkombi; SUV; Sedan; Herrgårdsvagn; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de carro: Conversível; Cupê; Cruzado; Hatchback; SUV; Sedã; Wagon; Outro
pl: Typ samochodu: Wymienna; Coupé; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Kombi; Inne
nl: Autotype: Converteerbaar; Coupé; Gekruist; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Stationcar; Andere
zh-TW: 車型: 可轉換; 轎跑車; 交叉型; 掀背車; SUV; 自用小客車; 旅行車; 其他
ko: 자동차 유형: 컨버터블; 쿠페; 크로스오버; 해치백; SUV; 세단; 왜건; 기타
it: Tipo di auto: Convertibile; Coupé; A incrocio; Hatchback; SUV; Berlina; Wagon; Altro
ro-RO: Tip mașină: Decapotabilă; Coupé; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Wagon; Altele
es: Tipo de auto: Convertible; Coupé; Cruzado; Hatchback; SUV; Sedán; Vagón; Otros
th: ประเภทรถ: ปรับรูปแบบได้; คูเป้; แบบครอสโอเวอร์; แฮตช์แบ็ก; SUV; ซีดาน; วากอน; อื่นๆ
da: Biltype: Konvertibel; Coupe; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Wagon; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta avtomobila: Pretvorljivo; Kupe; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Limuzina; Wagon; Drugo
hu: Autó típusa: Kabrió; Kupé; Crossover; Ferde hátú; SUV; Szedán; Kisteherautó; Egyéb
fi: Autotyyppi: Muunnettava; Coupé; Crossover; Viistoperä; SUV; Sedan; Farmariauto; Muu
tr: Araba Tipi: Dönüştürülebilir; Spor araba; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Vagon; Diğer
ja: 車種: コンバーチブル; クーペ; クロスオーバー; ハッチバック; SUV; セダン; ワゴン; その他
cs: Typ vozidla: Konvertibilní; Kupé; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Wagon; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ vozidla: S odnímateľnými ramienkami; Kupé; Crossover; Hatchback; SUV; Sedan; Kombi; Iné